Illinois, session 104th, SB2861.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 17-132 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/17-132)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 17-132)7    Sec. 17-132. Payments and certification of salary 8deductions. 9    (a) An Employer shall cause the Fund to receive all 10members' payroll records and pension contributions within 30 11calendar days after each predesignated payday. For purposes of 12this Section, the predesignated payday shall be determined in 13accordance with each Employer's payroll schedule for 14contributions to the Fund.15    (b) An Employer that fails to timely certify and submit 16payroll records to the Fund is subject to a statutory penalty 17in the amount of $100 per day for each day that a required 18certification and submission is late.19    Amounts not received by the 30th calendar day after the 20predesignated payday shall be deemed delinquent and subject to 21a penalty consisting of interest, which shall accrue on a 22monthly basis at the Fund's then effective actuarial rate of 23return, and liquidated damages in the amount of $100 per day,   SB2861 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 16724 RPS 30130 b1not to exceed 20% of the principal contributions due, which 2shall be mandatory except for good cause shown and in the 3discretion of the Board. 4    An Employer in possession of member contributions deducted 5from payroll checks is holding Fund assets, and thus becomes a 6fiduciary over those assets. 7    (c) The payroll records shall report (1) all pensionable 8salary earned in that pay period, exclusive of salaries for 9overtime, extracurricular activities, or any employment on an 10optional basis, such as in summer school; (2) adjustments to 11pensionable salary, exclusive of salaries for overtime, 12extracurricular activities, or any employment on an optional 13basis, such as in summer school, made in a pay period for any 14prior pay periods; (3) pension contributions attributable to 15pensionable salary earned in the reported pay period or the 16adjusted pay period as required by subsection (b) of Section 1717-131; and (4) any salary paid by an Employer if that salary 18is compensation for validated service and is exclusive of 19salary for overtime, extracurricular activities, or any 20employment on an optional basis, such as in summer school. 21Payroll records required by item (4) of this paragraph shall 22identify the number of days of service rendered by the member 23and whether each day of service represents a partial or whole 24day of service.25    (d) The appropriate officers of the Employer shall certify 26and submit the payroll records no later than 30 calendar days   SB2861 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 16724 RPS 30130 b1after each predesignated payday. The certification shall 2constitute a confirmation of the accuracy of such deductions 3according to the provisions of this Article.4    Each Charter School and contract school shall designate an 5administrator as a "Pension Officer". The Pension Officer 6shall be responsible for certifying all payroll information, 7including contributions due and certified sick days payable 8pursuant to Section 17-134, and assuring resolution of 9reported payroll and contribution deficiencies. 10    (e) The Board has the authority to conduct payroll audits 11of a charter school or contract school to determine the 12existence of any delinquencies in contributions to the Fund, 13and such charter school or contract school shall be required 14to provide such books and records and contribution information 15as the Board or its authorized representative may require. 16Charter schools and contract schools shall retain all payroll 17records and contribution information for a minimum of 5 years 18after the payroll records and contribution information are 19created. The Board is also authorized to collect delinquent 20contributions from charter schools and contract schools and 21develop procedures for the collection of such delinquencies. 22Collection procedures may include legal proceedings in the 23courts of the State of Illinois. Expenses, including 24reasonable attorneys' fees, incurred in the collection of 25delinquent contributions may be assessed by the Board against 26the charter school or contract school.   SB2861 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 16724 RPS 30130 b1    (f) The Fund shall provide a conditional grace period for 2contract schools that show evidence of timely and good faith 3efforts to submit payroll records and make pension 4contributions due between January 1, 2022 and April 1, 2022. 5If payroll records and pension contributions due during that 6time period are not submitted by April 1, 2022, the statutory 7penalties, liquidated damages, and interest shall be 8calculated from the original due date to the submission date 9of the pension contributions or payroll records, as 10applicable.11    Evidence of timely and good faith efforts shall include, 12but are not limited to, the following:13        (1) evidence of the contract school's continuing 14    efforts to submit payroll records and make pension 15    contributions, both before and after the date the payroll 16    records and pension contributions were due;17        (2) documented evidence submitted by the contract 18    school of the contract school's continuing efforts to 19    submit payroll records and make pension contributions;20        (3) evidence in the possession of the Fund of the 21    contract school's continuing efforts to submit payroll 22    records and make pension contributions; and23        (4) contact by the contract school with the Fund to 24    seek assistance and notify the Fund of difficulties with 25    submitting the payroll records and making the pension 26    contributions within a period of time determined by the   SB2861 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 16724 RPS 30130 b1    Board after the date the pension contributions and payroll 2    records were due.3    The Fund may adopt rules to implement the changes made by 4this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly. 5(Source: P.A. 101-261, eff. 8-9-19; 102-636, eff. 8-27-21.) 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.